Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.170

Oath of personal representative.

Before letters testamentary or of administration are issued, each personal representative or an officer of a bank or trust company qualified to act as a personal representative, must take and subscribe an oath, before some person authorized to administer oaths, that the duties of the trust as personal representative will be performed according to law, which oath must be filed in the cause.

[ 2005 c 97 s 3; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.170. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 66; RRS s 1436; prior: Code 1881 s 1393; 1877 p 211 s 4; 1873 p 329 s 366.]